src/morphology/stems/altstem-verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_IRROTA
!! € irrota
0:rot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:rot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:toa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:rot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ron   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ro   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:rot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:rot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_HALJETA
!! € haljeta
0:jet    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:jet    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kea     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kea   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kea   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kes   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kes   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:jet   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:jen   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:je   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:jet   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:jet   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_ILJETÄ
!! € iljetä
0:jet    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:jet    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:keä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:keä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:keä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:kes   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kes   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:jet   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:jen   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:je   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:jet   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:jet   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_MYRSKYTÄ
!! € myrskytä
0:t    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:t    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:s   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_LASSOTA
!! € lassota
0:t    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:t    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:a   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:a   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:s   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:t   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_SELVITÄ
!! € lämmitä
0:t    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:t    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:s   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_RYÖPYTÄ
!! € ryöpytä
0:yt    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:yt    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:pyä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pyä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pyä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:pys   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pys   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:yn   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_PEITOTA
!! € peitota
0:ot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:toa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:on   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KERITÄ
!! € keritä
0:it    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:it    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kiä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kiä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kiä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:kis   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kis   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:it   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:in   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:it   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:it   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_MUODOTA
!! € muodota
0:dot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:dot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:toa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:don   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:do   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_LÄMMITÄ
!! € lämmitä
0:mit    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:mit    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:piä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:piä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:piä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:pis   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pis   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:mit   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:min   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:mi   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:mit   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:mit   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_AALLOTA
!! € aallota
0:lot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:lot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:toa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:lot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:lon   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:lo   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:lot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:lot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_HELLITÄ
!! € hellitä
0:lit    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:lit    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tiä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tiä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tiä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:tis   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tis   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:lit   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:lin   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:li   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:lit   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:lit   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_TAITAA
!! € taitaa
0:ta      V_BACK_AINF   ;
0:ta      V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da      V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta      V_BACK_3SG_A      ;
0:s       V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta        V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ta        V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de        V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det       V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:det       V_BACK_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_TIETÄÄ
!! € tietää
0:tä      V_FRONT_AINF   ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:dä      V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä      V_FRONT_3SG_Ä      ;
0:s       V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s       V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:tä        V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de        V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det       V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:det       V_FRONT_TUPCP_0   ;

LEXICON V_VIPAJAA
!! € vipajaa
0     V_BACK_AINF    ;
0     V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0     V_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0     V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;

LEXICON V_HELÄJÄÄ
!! € heläjää
0     V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0     V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0     V_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0     V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0     V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;

LEXICON V_RAIKAA
!! € raikaa
0     V_BACK_AINF    ;
0     V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0     V_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;

LEXICON V_ÄHKÄÄ
!! € raikaa
0     V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0     V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0     V_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0     V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;

LEXICON V_OLLA
!! € olla
0:oll    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:oll    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:ole    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
+Act+Prs+Sg3:on V_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
0:ol    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ol    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ol    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:lie   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ol   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ol   V_BACK_PASSIVE_L    ;
0:ol  V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ol   V_BACK_TUPCP_L    ;
